Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 331.301, subsection 17, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 17. The board of supervisors may by ordinance or resolution prohibit or limit the use of consumer fireworks or display fireworks, as described in section 727.2 , on any day other than July 3, July 4, and December 31 in accordance with section 727.2, subsection 4, if the board determines that the use of such devices would constitute a threat to public safety or private property, or if the board determines that the use of such devices would constitute a nuisance to neighboring landowners. Sec. 2. Section 364.2, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6. A city council may by ordinance or resolution prohibit or limit the use of consumer fireworks, display fireworks, or Senate File 303, p. 2 novelties, as described in section 727.2 , on any day other than July 3, July 4, and December 31 in accordance with section 727.2, subsection 4 . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 303, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor